Tennessee statutes. Title 62 Professions, Businesses and Trades
Part 3

Licensing

62-5-301. Publication of examination rules.

The board of funeral directors and embalmers shall publish its rules and regulations covering subjects to be included in all examinations, the method of conducting the examinations and other matters pertaining to the examinations.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 7 (Williams, § 7140.7); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-508; Acts 2001, ch. 188, § 1.

62-5-302. Preservation of examination papers.

All manuscripts submitted in answer to questions on any examination provided in this chapter shall be kept on file for at least sixty (60) days after the results are announced by the board, shall be made available to the applicant for examination in the presence of a member of the board or representatives of the examination testing service and shall be made available in case the applicant desires to contest the results.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 6 (Williams, § 7140.6); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-509; Acts 2001, ch. 188, § 2.

62-5-303. Licensing requirement.

In order to safeguard life and health and to prevent the spread of contagious diseases and to improve sanitary conditions and public health generally, it is required that only properly qualified persons shall engage in funeral directing, embalming and operating of a funeral establishment.

Any person engaged in funeral directing, embalming and operating of a funeral establishment in this state shall be licensed by the board created in part 2 of this chapter prior to engaging in funeral directing, embalming and operating of a funeral establishment.

It is unlawful for any person to engage in, or offer to engage in, either funeral directing, embalming or operation of a funeral establishment unless the person or business has been duly licensed under this chapter.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 1 (Williams, § 7140.1); Acts 1968, ch. 542, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-510.

Compiler's Notes. The offense in this section may be affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989, compiled in title 40, chapter 35. See §§ 39-11-114, 40-35-110, 40-35-111.

62-5-304. Application for funeral establishment license.

Every person, partnership, firm, association or corporation desiring to commence the operation of a funeral establishment after January 1, 2008, shall make application to the board, along with payment of a nonrefundable fee as set by the board.

All applications shall show the:

Name of establishment;

Address of establishment;

Owner or owners of establishment;

Name and address of the licensed funeral director who will act as manager of the funeral establishment;

Names and addresses of all licensed funeral directors and embalmers, designating whether they are part-time or full-time employees; and

Names of all unlicensed assistants.

Each establishment location shall be licensed separately from any other funeral establishment.

Acts 1968, ch. 542, § 3; T.C.A., § 62-511; Acts 1989, ch. 523, § 149; 2007, ch. 297, § 1.

Cross-References. Fee for applicants in business on December 31, 1968, § 62-5-310.

62-5-305. Application for funeral director's license — Apprenticeship.

Every person not previously licensed in this state as a funeral director, desiring to engage in the practice or business of funeral directing, shall make application to the board, along with a nonrefundable fee as set by the board.

The application shall contain the name of the applicant, showing that the applicant:

Has attained eighteen (18) years of age;

Is a citizen of the United States or an individual enumerated in 8 U.S.C. § 1622(b);

Is of good moral character;

Is properly protected against communicable diseases, either through immunization or education;

Has graduated from a high school or has earned a GED(R) recognized by a state education department;

Has successfully completed a program of study in funeral service education consisting of no less than thirty (30) semester hours, forty-five (45) quarter hours or the equivalent from a school accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education and evidenced by an official transcript; and

Has completed two (2) years of apprenticeship in the presence of and under the direction and supervision of a licensed funeral director. An associate's degree from a college accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education may be substituted for one (1) year of apprenticeship.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 8 (Williams, § 7140.8); Acts 1971, ch. 161, § 2; 1973, ch. 35, § 1; 1980, ch. 554, § 6; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-512; Acts 1985, ch. 354, § 7; 1989, ch. 523, § 150; 2001, ch. 188, §§ 5-8; 2007, ch. 297, § 2; 2016, ch. 838, § 9; 2020, ch. 625, § 2.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added “or an individual enumerated in 8 U.S.C. § 1622(b)” in (b)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 625, § 4. March 25, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. The practical training and experience required of applicants for a funeral director's license may occur outside the state; provided, that such apprenticeship occurs under the personal supervision and instruction of a funeral director licensed in Tennessee, OAG 03-003, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 2 (1/13/03).

The Eligibility Verification for Entitlements Act (EVEA) can be read in harmony with laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or U.S. citizens or resident aliens and therefore did not impliedly repeal those laws. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens also violate the Equal Protection Clause because they discriminate based on alienage and would not satisfy strict scrutiny. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. Laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens do not violate the Equal Protection Clause, however, because they discriminate only against unlawful aliens and lawful aliens who are not permanent residents. Those categories of aliens are not a suspect class, and the laws at issue would likely satisfy rational basis review. The Department of Commerce and Insurance is not required to enforce the requirements that an applicant for licensure, registration, or certification be a “citizen of the United States” or a “citizen of the United States or resident alien.” OAG 18-42, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (9/13/2018).

62-5-306. Examination for funeral directors — Issuance of license.

In addition to the qualifications listed in § 62-5-305, every person desiring to enter into the practice of funeral directing, except as otherwise provided in this chapter, shall pass an examination to determine the applicant's knowledge and fitness for the practice of funeral directing as required by this chapter.

The board shall determine the subjects of examination and their scope, content and character, which in any examination shall be the same for all applicants. Examinations shall be held no less than twice each year, and the board shall give thirty (30) days' notice in advance of the time and place of the examinations.

If the board finds upon examination that the applicant has a reasonable knowledge of sanitation and disinfection of premises, clothing, bedding and other articles subject to contagion and infection, has a reasonable knowledge of the sanitation and disinfection of bodies of diseased persons where death was caused by infectious diseases or communicable diseases, has all the requirements and qualifications stated in this chapter and has complied with all the rules and regulations of the board applying to funeral directors, the board shall, upon receipt of a fee as set by the board, issue to the applicant a license to practice funeral directing.

The current license of each funeral director shall be available for inspection in the office of the funeral establishment in which the funeral director works. If a funeral director works in more than one (1) establishment, the funeral director shall obtain from the board, for a fee established by the board, the number of duplicate licenses necessary to have a license available for inspection at each establishment at which the funeral director works.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 9 (Williams, § 7140.9); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-513; Acts 1985, ch. 354, § 8; 1989, ch. 523, § 151; 1991, ch. 523, § 1; 2001, ch. 188, §§ 3, 9, 15.

62-5-307. Application for embalmer's license — Apprenticeship.

No person shall be granted a license to engage in the practice of embalming dead human bodies within this state unless the person makes application to the board for the license, along with a nonrefundable fee as set by the board.

The application shall contain the name of the applicant, showing that the applicant:

Has attained eighteen (18) years of age;

Is a citizen of the United States or an individual enumerated in 8 U.S.C. § 1622(b);

Is of good moral character;

Is properly protected against communicable disease, either through immunization or education;

Has graduated from a high school or has earned a GED(R) recognized by a state education department;

Has obtained an associate degree by successfully completing a mortuary science program consisting of not less than sixty (60) semester hours, ninety (90) quarter hours or the equivalent, with a program accredited by the American Board of Funeral Service Education and evidenced by an official transcript; and

Has completed one (1) year of apprenticeship in the presence of and under the direction and supervision of a licensed embalmer.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 11 (Williams, § 7140.11); Acts 1973, ch. 36, § 1; 1973, ch. 39, § 1; 1980, ch. 554, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-514; Acts 1985, ch. 354, § 9; 1989, ch. 523, § 152; 2001, ch. 188, §§ 10, 11; 2007, ch. 297, § 3; 2019, ch. 161, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added “or an individual enumerated in 8 U.S.C. S 1622(b)” at the end of (b)(2); and substituted “associate degree” for “associate of arts degree” in (b)(6).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 161, § 3. April 18, 2019.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253.

Attorney General Opinions. The Eligibility Verification for Entitlements Act (EVEA) can be read in harmony with laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or U.S. citizens or resident aliens and therefore did not impliedly repeal those laws. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens also violate the Equal Protection Clause because they discriminate based on alienage and would not satisfy strict scrutiny. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. Laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens do not violate the Equal Protection Clause, however, because they discriminate only against unlawful aliens and lawful aliens who are not permanent residents. Those categories of aliens are not a suspect class, and the laws at issue would likely satisfy rational basis review. The Department of Commerce and Insurance is not required to enforce the requirements that an applicant for licensure, registration, or certification be a “citizen of the United States” or a “citizen of the United States or resident alien.” OAG 18-42, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (9/13/2018).

62-5-308. Embalmers' examination — Issuance of license.

In addition to the qualifications listed in § 62-5-307, every person desiring to enter into the practice of embalming, except as provided in this chapter, shall pass an examination to determine the person's knowledge and fitness for the practice of embalming, as required by this chapter.

The board shall determine the subjects of examination and their scope, content and character, which in any examination shall be the same for all applicants. Examinations shall be held no less than twice each year, and the board shall give thirty (30) days' notice in advance of the time and place of the examinations.

Upon examination, if the board finds that the applicant meets the requirements of age, citizenship, moral character, education, experience and having successfully passed the examination, the board shall, upon receipt of a fee as set by the board, issue a license to an applicant to engage in the practice of embalming.

The current license of each embalmer shall be available for inspection in the office of the funeral establishment in which the embalmer works. If an embalmer works in more than one (1) establishment, the embalmer shall obtain from the board, for a fee established by the board, the number of duplicate licenses necessary to have a license available for inspection at each establishment at which the embalmer works.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 12 (Williams, § 7140.12); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-515; Acts 1985, ch. 354, § 10; 1989, ch. 523, § 153; 2001, ch. 188, §§ 4, 12, 16.

62-5-309. Practice by unregistered persons prohibited.

It is unlawful for any person not a registered funeral director or embalmer to engage in funeral directing or embalming.

It is unlawful for any person, partnership, firm, association or corporation not licensed as provided in this chapter to engage in the operation of a funeral establishment.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 13 (Williams, § 7140.13); Acts 1968, ch. 542, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-516.

Compiler's Notes. The offenses in this section may be affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989, compiled in title 40, chapter 35. See §§ 39-11-114, 40-35-110, 40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253.

62-5-310. Licenses to establishments operating before 1969.

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

Any person on February 8, 1951, who was employed as an embalmer by a funeral director in this state, shall be entitled to take the examination prescribed in this chapter upon application to the board, prior to July 1, 1972, notwithstanding any other requirement.

Any person, partnership, firm, association or corporation actively engaged in the operation of a funeral establishment on or before December 31, 1968, shall be granted a license for the operation of a funeral home establishment upon application accompanied by payment of a fifteen dollar ($15.00) fee; provided, that the applicant has complied with every other provision of this chapter and rules and regulations that the board may adopt in pursuance of this chapter.

Any person who on January 1, 1960, held a license granted by authority of this state to engage in the profession of embalming and who is no longer so licensed for the sole reason that the person voluntarily chose not to pay the license renewal fee shall not be required to submit to an examination but shall be entitled to receive a license upon the same terms and conditions as are provided in this chapter for the renewal of licenses of those who are licensed under this chapter; provided, that the person pays all license renewal fees that would have been required from the date the license was allowed to lapse until the date application for renewal pursuant to this subsection (c) is made.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 18 (Williams, § 7140.18); Acts 1959, ch. 198, § 1; 1968, ch. 542, § 3; 1972, ch. 553, § 2; 1972, ch. 847, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-517; Acts 1992, ch. 699, § 1; 2020, ch. 625, § 1.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted (a)(1) and (a)(2), which read: “(a)(1) Any person who on February 8, 1951, held a license granted by any authority of this state to carry on the profession of embalming, or any person who was on February 8, 1951, a regular and bona fide funeral director in this state, shall not be required to submit to an examination, but shall be entitled to receive a license upon the same terms and conditions as are provided in this chapter for the renewal of licenses of those who may be licensed under this chapter; provided, that the application is made prior to January 1, 1973. The license shall be issued by the board upon the payment of a fee of five dollars ($5.00) per license. “(2) All such applicants shall be subject to every other provision of this chapter and rules and regulations that the board may adopt in pursuance of this chapter.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 625, § 4. March 25, 2020.

62-5-311. Reciprocity — Examination — Continuing education — Fee.

A nonresident of this state who holds a valid license as a funeral director or embalmer issued by another state or provincial authority may apply for a license as a funeral director or embalmer in this state by submitting written application to the board on the prescribed form, accompanied by:

A fee as set by the board per license applied for; and

A certificate showing that the applicant was duly examined by the other state or provincial authority at a time when the applicant was not a resident of this state.

If the nonresident applicant receives a scaled score of seventy-five (75) or better on an examination administered by the board, the board may, upon receipt of the fee and certificate required by subsection (a), issue to the applicant the appropriate license.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(3), the examination administered by the board shall only be administered by the board if the board determines that the applicant meets or exceeds each of the minimum qualifications required for funeral directors as described in § 62-5-305(b)(1)-(7) or embalmers as described in § 62-5-307(b)(1)-(7).

A nonresident applicant failing to meet the minimum qualifications described in subdivision (b)(2), based solely upon a failure to meet § 62-5-305(b)(6) or (b)(7) for funeral directors or § 62-5-307(b)(6) or (b)(7) for embalmers, may meet such qualifications provided that the nonresident applicant has been licensed by another state or provincial authority in good standing for five (5) years and has been employed as a funeral director or embalmer, or both, for such time.

For purposes of this section, the board shall limit the examination administered by the board to questions relating to the laws and rules governing the practice in which the nonresident applicant wishes to engage.

Persons who receive a license as a funeral director or embalmer, or both, pursuant to this section, shall submit with their renewal application evidence of compliance with all the requirements of part 6 of this chapter relative to continuing education. Continuing education requirements may be completed in a state other than Tennessee if the continuing education courses are approved by the board.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or rule to the contrary, the board is authorized to require an application fee and a license fee for persons applying to the board for reciprocity.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 20 (Williams, § 7140.20); Acts 1980, ch. 554, §§ 5, 8; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 62-506, 62-518; Acts 1985, ch. 354, § 11; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 154, 155; 1999, ch. 20, § 2; 2001, ch. 188, § 13; 2010, ch. 1018, § 1; 2014, ch. 690, § 4.

62-5-312. Registration as an apprentice.

When beginning the required apprenticeship, the person shall file an apprentice registration form with the board and shall pay a fee in the amount to be established by the board. The registration shall be valid for a period of three (3) years from the date of registration, or until the registrant has completed the apprenticeship requirements, whichever occurs first.

The apprentice registration form shall contain the name of the registrant, showing that the registrant:

Has attained eighteen (18) years of age;

Is a citizen of the United States or an individual enumerated in 8 U.S.C. § 1622(b);

Is of good moral character;

Has graduated from a high school or has earned a GED(R) recognized by a state education department; and

Is a bona fide paid employee of an establishment working no less than forty (40) hours per week in the presence of and under the direction and supervision of a licensed funeral director or embalmer.

All persons who are apprentice funeral directors, apprentice embalmers and mortuary school students registered by the board and who are in the process of fulfilling their apprenticeship and educational requirements on or before December 31, 2007, shall not be required to complete the apprenticeship requirements that become effective on January 1, 2008. The apprentices and mortuary school students shall complete all requirements to become licensed by the board as a funeral director or embalmer on or before June 30, 2011.

When beginning the required course of study, the person shall file a student registration form with the board and shall pay a fee in the amount to be established by the board. The registration shall be valid for a period of three (3) years from the date of registration, or until the registrant has completed the apprenticeship requirements, whichever occurs first.

Acts 2007, ch. 297, § 4; 2012, ch. 738, § 1; 2018, ch. 651, §§ 1, 2; 2020, ch. 625, § 3.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 62-5-312 (Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 19 (Williams, § 7140.19); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-519), concerning apprenticeship of persons in armed forces, was deleted as obsolete in 1990.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 651, § 3 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall apply to all persons who register with the board as an apprentice funeral director, apprentice embalmer, or mortuary school student on and after April 9, 2018.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment added “or an individual enumerated in 8 U.S.C. § 1622(b)” in (b)(2).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 625, § 4. March 25, 2020.

Attorney General Opinions. The Eligibility Verification for Entitlements Act (EVEA) can be read in harmony with laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or U.S. citizens or resident aliens and therefore did not impliedly repeal those laws. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens also violate the Equal Protection Clause because they discriminate based on alienage and would not satisfy strict scrutiny. State laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens are preempted to the extent they conflict with a federal law that limits States’ authority to determine alien eligibility for state public benefits, including professional and commercial licenses. Laws requiring licensure applicants to be U.S. citizens or resident aliens do not violate the Equal Protection Clause, however, because they discriminate only against unlawful aliens and lawful aliens who are not permanent residents. Those categories of aliens are not a suspect class, and the laws at issue would likely satisfy rational basis review. The Department of Commerce and Insurance is not required to enforce the requirements that an applicant for licensure, registration, or certification be a “citizen of the United States” or a “citizen of the United States or resident alien.” OAG 18-42, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 42 (9/13/2018).

62-5-313. Requirements for operation.

Every person, firm, partnership or corporation, at each and every place of business conducted by that person, firm, partnership or corporation, in the business or practice of funeral directing shall have a fixed place of business or establishment devoted to the care and preparation of dead human bodies and shall have a licensed funeral director in charge of each such place of business; and no employee or member of the firm or corporation shall engage in the care, preparation, disposal or burial of dead human bodies and the management of funerals, nor discharge the duties of a funeral director, unless the employee or member is a licensed funeral director in accordance with this chapter. Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to prohibit the use of unlicensed assistants when they are under the direction and supervision of a licensed funeral director.

A license to operate a funeral establishment shall not be issued by the board unless the applicant has at least one (1) full-time person duly licensed for the practice of funeral directing and a duly licensed embalmer in attendance during the preparation of the dead remains.

Each funeral establishment must have available for its use a preparation room equipped with tile, cement or composition floor, necessary drainage and ventilation and necessary instruments and supplies for the preparation of embalming dead human bodies for burial, transportation or other disposition.

Every funeral establishment licensed under this chapter must be managed and supervised by a licensed funeral director, responsible for each funeral establishment.

Prior to or at the time of placing a dead human body in a casket for interment or entombment, each funeral establishment shall securely affix or attach to the body, preferably upon the ankle, a permanent identification device approved by the board, containing the decedent's name, date of birth, and date of death. If that information is not available to the funeral establishment, then a permanent identification device stating that the information is not available shall be affixed or attached to the body.

If a dead human body is to be cremated, then a permanent identification device approved by the board, containing the decedent's name, date of birth, and date of death shall be placed in the crematory urn before the remains are placed in the urn. If the information is not available to the funeral establishment, then a permanent identification device stating the information is not available shall be placed in the crematory urn before the remains are placed in the urn.

No funeral establishment shall solicit or collect a fee for the affixing or attaching of a permanent identification device pursuant to this section.

Failure to comply with this subsection (d) is a disciplinary offense and is punishable as provided in § 62-5-317.

Each funeral establishment must have its current license available for inspection in the office of the funeral establishment.

Nothing in this chapter prohibits the use of a licensed funeral establishment to prepare any remains for disposition or to perform, or offer to perform, commemorative services, if the commemorative services are performed in compliance with this chapter and applicable provisions in title 68, and rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter and title 68. For the purposes of this subsection (f), “commemorative services” means any ceremony for the dead prior to burial, cremation, or any other legal form of final disposition.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 10 (Williams, § 7140.10); modified; Acts 1968, ch. 542, § 3; 1975, ch. 346, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-520; Acts 1995, ch. 21, § 1; 2001, ch. 188, § 17; 2017, ch. 139, § 1; 2017, ch. 144, § 1.

62-5-314. Use of names of unregistered persons restricted.

The name of any living person who has not been licensed as provided in this chapter shall not be shown or displayed upon any funeral establishment, or used alone, in, as part of or in connection, association, combination or together with the name or title of any person, firm, corporation or other form of enterprise engaged in undertaking or embalming, on any card, sign, stationery or other printed or written instrument or device, in any announcement or advertisement or in any manner so as to give or tend to give the impression that the person is licensed or entitled to practice either as a funeral director or embalmer.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 18 (Williams, § 7140.18); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-521.

Attorney General Opinions. Use of names of unlicensed persons in connection with funeral business, OAG 95-066, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 72 (6/19/95).

62-5-315. Term of licenses — Not transferable — Duplicates — Renewals.

All licenses issued to funeral directors or embalmers as provided in this chapter shall be issued for a period of two (2) years and shall be renewed biennially, at a fee in an amount to be established by the board, subject to this chapter.

All licenses issued to funeral establishments, as provided in this chapter, shall be issued for a period of two (2) years and shall be renewed biennially at a fee in an amount to be established by the board, subject to this chapter.

No license issued to a funeral director, embalmer or funeral establishment granted under this chapter shall be transferable or assignable.

A duplicate license to replace any license lost, destroyed or mutilated may be obtained from the board upon submission of a proper letter of request, accompanied by payment of a fee as set by the board.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 14 (Williams, § 7140.14); Acts 1959, ch. 198, § 2; 1968, ch. 542, § 4; 1972, ch. 553, § 3; 1980, ch. 554, § 9; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-522; Acts 1985, ch. 354, § 12; 1989, ch. 360, § 6; 1989, ch. 523, § 156; 1990, ch. 1026, § 39.

Cross-References. Director of division of regulatory boards to promulgate rules concerning certain license renewal dates, § 56-1-302.

62-5-316. Invalidity of unrenewed license — Renewal, reinstatement or reapplication.

Any license that is not renewed by its expiration date becomes invalid. The holder of the invalid license shall not practice the profession for which the license was issued, nor shall an establishment be operated if the establishment's license has become invalid, until such time as the license has been renewed or reinstated or a new license has been issued.

When any license issued by the board becomes invalid because of nonrenewal, the executive director shall send a written notice to the license holder at the license holder's last known address, informing the license holder that the license holder cannot practice that profession or operate that establishment until the invalid license is renewed or reinstated or a new license is issued. The notice shall also state that the license may be renewed or reinstated at any time within ninety (90) days of the license expiration date by payment of the renewal fee and of a penalty fee in an amount to be established by the board. Any license not renewed or reinstated within ninety (90) days of the license expiration date shall not be subject to renewal or reinstatement and the license holder shall reapply as for an initial license; provided, that any examination shall be limited to this chapter and any rules promulgated pursuant to this chapter, and that the education requirements in § 62-5-305(b)(6) and § 62-5-307(b)(6) are not applicable.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 17 (Williams, § 7140.17); Acts 1980, ch. 554, § 10; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-523; Acts 2001, ch. 188, § 14; 2012, ch. 799, § 1.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

62-5-317. Grounds for denial, suspension or revocation of license.

The board may refuse to grant or may suspend, revoke or refuse to renew any license granted to any person under this chapter if:

The applicant for or holder of the license obtained the license by fraud or misrepresentation either in the application for the license or in passing the examination for the license;

The applicant for or holder of the license has been convicted of a felony or crime involving moral turpitude. However, an action taken under this subdivision (a)(2) shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 76, part 1 of this title;

The applicant for or holder of the license has been guilty of willfully violating any section of this chapter or any rule or regulation of the state or local board of health governing the disposition of dead human bodies;

The applicant for or holder of the license has been guilty of immoral or unprofessional conduct;

The applicant for or holder of the license knowingly permits an unlicensed person to engage in the profession or business of funeral directing or embalming under the applicant's or holder's supervision;

The applicant for or holder of the license has been guilty of habitual drunkenness or is addicted to the use of morphine, cocaine or other habit-forming drugs;

The applicant for or holder of the license has been guilty of refusing to promptly surrender the custody of a dead human body upon the expressed order of the person legally entitled to the body;

The applicant has received payment directly or indirectly or has caused to be paid directly or indirectly any sum of money or other valuable consideration for the securing of business or for obtaining authority to dispose of dead human bodies; or

The applicant or holder performs services after December 31, 1968, in a professional capacity as a funeral director or embalmer, or both, for any unlicensed funeral establishment operating in violation of this chapter.

In addition, the board may refuse to grant or may suspend, revoke or refuse to renew any license granted for the operation of a funeral establishment or to any funeral director or embalmer under this chapter for:

Misrepresentation or fraud in the conduct of the business of the funeral establishment;

False or misleading advertising;

Solicitation of dead human bodies by the licensee, the licensee's agents, assistants or employees, whether the solicitation occurs after death or when death is imminent; provided, that this shall not be deemed to prohibit general advertising. Nothing in this subdivision (b)(3) shall, however, prohibit, prevent or in any way restrict the sale of burial protection or burial insurance;

Employment directly or indirectly of any apprentice, agent, assistant, employee or other person, on a part-time or full-time basis or on commission, for the purpose of calling upon individuals or institutions by whose influence dead human bodies may be turned over to a particular funeral establishment;

The direct or indirect payment or offer of payment of a fee by the licensee or the licensee's agents, assistants or employees for the purpose of securing general establishment business;

Aiding or abetting an unlicensed person to practice within the funeral profession;

Solicitation or acceptance by the licensee of a rebate in consideration for recommending or causing a dead human body to be disposed of in any crematory, mausoleum or cemetery;

Using any casket or part of a casket that has previously been used as a receptacle for, or in connection with, the burial or other disposition of a dead human body, except the shipping of another dead human body; or where disposition of the dead human body is to be by cremation, it shall be permissible to utilize a previously used casket shell for viewing the remains if, and only if, a new interior or interior insert is installed prior to each usage of the casket shell;

Any willful violation of any state law or municipal or county ordinance or regulation affecting the handling or custody, care or transportation of dead human bodies;

Fraud or misrepresentation in renewing a license to operate a funeral establishment;

Unreasonably refusing to promptly surrender the custody of a dead human body upon the express order of the person lawfully entitled to the custody of the dead human body;

Knowingly making any false statement on the certificate of death;

A violation of any statutes pertaining to the prearrangement or prefinancing, or both, of a funeral in this state;

Supplying another person with false or misleading information concerning any law that requires embalmment of deceased persons;

Solicitation or acceptance by the licensee of a fee for the affixing or attaching of a permanent identification device to a dead human body that is placed in a casket to be interred or entombed;

Solicitation or acceptance by the licensee of a fee for the placing of a permanent identification device in a crematory urn before placing human remains in the urn;

Failure to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated or adopted by the board;

The applicant or licensee providing a monetary contribution in exchange for a business referral to any hospice providing hospice services as defined in § 68-11-201, or to any officer, administrator, board member, or employee of a hospice providing hospice services as defined in § 68-11-201;

The applicant or licensee owning five percent (5%) or more of any hospice providing hospice services as defined in § 68-11-201; or

The applicant or licensee entering into any type of ownership arrangement with any hospice providing hospice services as defined in § 68-11-201.

Subdivisions (b)(18)-(20) shall not:

Preclude a person or legal entity from giving a contribution to a hospice providing hospice services as defined in § 68-11-201; or

Apply to persons serving on boards or within organizations for which the persons receive no direct compensation but may receive reimbursement for activities related to the organization.

Acts 1951, ch. 13, § 15 (Williams, § 7140.15); Acts 1968, ch. 542, § 5; 1975, ch. 346, § 2; 1980, ch. 554, § 11; 1981, ch. 108, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 62-524; Acts 1995, ch. 21, § 2; 1996, ch. 810, § 1; 2002, ch. 809, § 3; 2014, ch. 555, §§ 1, 2; 2018, ch. 745, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2014, ch. 555, § 3 provided that this act, which added subdivisions (b)(18)-(20) and subsection (c), shall apply to any arrangements in violation of this act entered into or renewed on or after July 1, 2014.

Cross-References. Disposition of dead bodies, title 68, ch. 4.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253.